Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Chapter 72. Optometrists.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and intent in connection with the amendments to this chapter made by ch. 49, SLA 1988, see sec. 1, ch. 49, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 2, SSSLA 2017 (HB 159), which amended provisions in this chapter relating to opioid prescription and education on pain management and opioid use and addiction, see 2017 House Journal 408 — 410.

Collateral references. —

61 Am. Jur. 2d, Physicians, Surgeons and Other Healers, §§ 7, 34.

70 C.J.S., Physicians and Surgeons, §§ 22, 23.

Constitutionality of statutes and validity of regulations relating to optometry, 22 ALR2d 939.

Fitting of contact lenses as practice of optometry, 77 ALR3d 817.

What constitutes practice of “optometry”, 82 ALR4th 816.